Massachusetts, session 194th, H4162.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 17W the following section:-
Section 17X. (a) The commission shall provide to any person who is insured under the
group insurance commission coverage of all medical supplies for management of surgically
created or spontaneous fistulas and coverage of supplies related to ostomy care. The commission
shall not require the use of non-medical supplies for a patient to receive coverage under this
section. The commission shall make publicly available information about its coverage of
supplies related to ostomy care.
(b) If a person obtains new health insurance coverage, information about the person’s
ostomy care, patient history and prescriptions shall be transferred to the new insurer within 72
hours for continuity of care. Ostomy supply orders and shipments shall not be delayed during the
transition period.
of 9

(c) Healthcare payers shall reimburse suppliers of supplies related to ostomy care at a rate
not less than the Medicare reimbursement rate.
SECTION 2. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 51M the following section:-
Section 51N. Any acute-care hospital licensed pursuant to this chapter that performs
ostomy surgery shall employ and have access to certified healthcare professionals who specialize
in ostomy care. The acute-care hospital shall ensure ongoing follow-up care offers ostomy care
in an outpatient setting, as appropriate, with certified healthcare professionals who specialize in
ostomy care.
SECTION 3. Chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 12D the following section:-
Section 12D½. (a) A prescription issued in the commonwealth by a physician licensed
pursuant to this chapter for supplies related to an ostomy shall be valid for at least 1 year without
disruption in fulfillment and coverage for the duration of the prescription.
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a physician may prescribe
supplies related to ostomy care in a quantity exceeding any limit imposed by law, regulation,
rule, guidance or insurance policy if the physician determines that it is necessary and expedient
for patient care.
(c) Fulfillment of prescriptions related to ostomy supplies shall not be delayed by any
approval or appeal process.
of 9

(d) Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced
notification of prescription expiration to both patients and their prescribers.
(e) Fulfillment of prescriptions related to ostomy supplies shall be dispensed as written.
Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced notification of
their intention to substitute ostomy supply brands or products, also known as non-medical
switching. Notification by mail shall include samples of the proposed product substitution for the
patient to try. If a substitute product fails to meet or exceed the quality of the original and
thereby compromises the patient's ostomy care, the patient shall have the option of returning to
their original product or shall receive a product that matches the quality of the original.
SECTION 4. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10W the following section:-
Section 10X. (a) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health
maintenance organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators
under contract to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall
provide coverage of all medical supplies for management of surgically created or spontaneous
fistulas and coverage of supplies related to ostomy care. The division shall not require the use of
non-medical supplies for a patient to receive coverage under this section. The division shall
make publicly available information about its coverage of supplies related to ostomy care.
(b) If a person obtains new health insurance coverage, information about the person’s
ostomy care and patient history shall be transferred to the new insurer within 72 hours for
continuity of care. Ostomy supply orders and shipments shall not be delayed during the transition
period.
of 9

(c) Healthcare payers shall reimburse suppliers of supplies related to ostomy care at a rate
not less than the Medicare reimbursement rate.
(d) Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced
notification of prescription expiration to both patients and their prescribers.
(e) Fulfillment of prescriptions related to ostomy supplies shall be dispensed as written.
Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced notification of
their intention to substitute ostomy supply brands or products, also known as non-medical
switching. Notification by mail shall include samples of the proposed product substitution for the
patient to try. If a substitute product fails to meet or exceed the quality of the original and
thereby compromises the patient's ostomy care, the patient shall have the option of returning to
their original product or shall receive a product that matches the quality of the original.
SECTION 5. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 47ZZ the following section:-
Section 47AAA. (a) A policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued,
delivered or renewed within or without the commonwealth, which is considered creditable
coverage under section 1 of chapter 111M, shall provide coverage of all medical supplies for
management of surgically created or spontaneous fistulas and coverage of supplies related to
ostomy care including ostomy-related medical or physiological complications. The policy,
contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance shall not require the use of non-medical
supplies for a patient to receive coverage under this section, and shall make publicly available
information about its coverage of supplies related to ostomy care.
of 9

(b) If a person obtains new health insurance coverage, information about the person’s
ostomy care and patient history shall be transferred to the new insurer within 72 hours for
continuity of care. Ostomy supply orders and shipments shall not be delayed during the transition
period.
(c) Healthcare payers shall reimburse suppliers of supplies related to ostomy care at a rate
not less than the Medicare reimbursement rate.
(d) Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced
notification of prescription expiration to both patients and their prescribers.
(e) Fulfillment of prescriptions related to ostomy supplies shall be dispensed as written.
Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced notification of
their intention to substitute ostomy supply brands or products, also known as non-medical
switching. Notification by mail shall include samples of the proposed product substitution for the
patient to try. If a substitute product fails to meet or exceed the quality of the original and
thereby compromises the patient's ostomy care, the patient shall have the option of returning to
their original product or shall receive a product that matches the quality of the original.
SECTION 6. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8AAA the following section:-
Section 8BBB. (a) A contract, except contracts providing supplemental coverage to
Medicare or other governmental programs, between a subscriber and the corporation under an
individual or group hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed in the
commonwealth shall provide as benefits to all individual subscribers or members within the
commonwealth, and to all group members having a principal place of employment within the
of 9

commonwealth, coverage of all medical supplies for management of surgically created or
spontaneous fistulas and coverage of supplies related to ostomy care including ostomy-related
100 medical or physiological complications. The contract shall not require the use of non-medical
101 supplies for a patient to receive coverage under this section. The corporation shall make publicly
102 available information about its coverage of supplies related to ostomy care.
103 (b) If a person obtains new health insurance coverage, information about the person’s
104 ostomy care and patient history shall be transferred to the new insurer within 72 hours for
105 continuity of care. Ostomy supply orders and shipments shall not be delayed during the transition
106 period.
107 (c) Healthcare payers shall reimburse suppliers of supplies related to ostomy care at a rate
108 not less than the Medicare reimbursement rate.
109 (d) Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced
110 notification of prescription expiration to both patients and their prescribers.
111 (e) Fulfillment of prescriptions related to ostomy supplies shall be dispensed as written.
112 Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced notification of
113 their intention to substitute ostomy supply brands or products, also known as non-medical
114 switching. Notification by mail shall include samples of the proposed product substitution for the
115 patient to try. If a substitute product fails to meet or exceed the quality of the original and
116 thereby compromises the patient's ostomy care, the patient shall have the option of returning to
117 their original product or shall receive a product that matches the quality of the original.
118 SECTION 7. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
119 section 4AAA the following section:-
of 9

120 Section 4BBB. (a) A subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service
121 agreement delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage of all
122 medical supplies for management of surgically created or spontaneous fistulas and coverage of
123 supplies related to ostomy care. The subscription certificate shall not require the use of non-
124 medical supplies for a patient to receive coverage under this section. The medical service
125 corporation shall make publicly available information about its coverage of supplies related to
126 ostomy care.
127 (b) If a person obtains new health insurance coverage, information about the person’s
128 ostomy care and patient history shall be transferred to the new insurer within 72 hours for
129 continuity of care. Ostomy supply orders and shipments shall not be delayed during the transition
130 period.
131 (c) Healthcare payers shall reimburse suppliers of supplies related to ostomy care at a rate
132 not less than the Medicare reimbursement rate.
133 (d) Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced
134 notification of prescription expiration to both patients and their prescribers.
135 (e) Fulfillment of prescriptions related to ostomy supplies shall be dispensed as written.
136 Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced notification of
137 their intention to substitute ostomy supply brands or products, also known as non-medical
138 switching. Notification by mail shall include samples of the proposed product substitution for the
139 patient to try. If a substitute product fails to meet or exceed the quality of the original and
140 thereby compromises the patient's ostomy care, the patient shall have the option of returning to
141 their original product or shall receive a product that matches the quality of the original.
of 9

142 SECTION 8. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
143 section 4SS the following section:-
144 Section 4TT. (a) An individual or group health maintenance contract, except contracts
145 providing supplemental coverage to Medicare or other governmental programs, that is issued or
146 renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage and benefits of all medical supplies
147 for management of surgically created or spontaneous fistulas and coverage of supplies related to
148 ostomy care. The contract shall not require the use of non-medical supplies for a patient to
149 receive coverage under this section. The health maintenance organization shall make publicly
150 available information about its coverage of supplies related to ostomy care.
151 (b) If a person obtains new health insurance coverage, information about the person’s
152 ostomy care and patient history shall be transferred to the new insurer within 72 hours for
153 continuity of care. Ostomy supply orders and shipments shall not be delayed during the transition
154 period.
155 (c) Healthcare payers shall reimburse suppliers of supplies related to ostomy care at a rate
156 not less than the Medicare reimbursement rate.
157 (d) Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced
158 notification of prescription expiration to both patients and their prescribers.
159 (e) Fulfillment of prescriptions related to ostomy supplies shall be dispensed as written.
160 Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced notification of
161 their intention to substitute ostomy supply brands or products, also known as non-medical
162 switching. Notification by mail shall include samples of the proposed product substitution for the
163 patient to try. If a substitute product fails to meet or exceed the quality of the original and
of 9

164 thereby compromises the patient's ostomy care, the patient shall have the option of returning to
165 their original product or shall receive a product that matches the quality of the original.
of 9